Idaho, session 2025, H0163.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-5206, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-5206. REQUIREMENTS FOR OPERATING A PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL. (1) A
public charter school shall be nonsectarian in its programs, affiliations,
admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, shall
not charge tuition, levy taxes, or issue bonds, and shall not discriminate
against any student on any basis prohibited by the federal or state consti-
tution or any federal, state, or local law. Public charter schools shall
comply with the federal individuals with disabilities education act. Ad-
mission to a public charter school shall not be determined according to the
place of residence of the student or of the student's parent or guardian
within the district.
(2) No board of trustees of a public school district may require:
(a) Any employee of the school district to be involuntarily assigned to
work in a public charter school; or
(b) Any student enrolled in the school district to attend a public char-
ter school.
(3) Employment of charter school teachers and administrators shall be
on written contract.
(4) Administrators may be certified pursuant to the requirements set
forth in chapter 12, title 33, Idaho Code, pertaining to traditional public
schools or may hold a charter school administrator certificate, which re-
quires that the administrator:
(a) Holds a bachelor's degree from an accredited four (4) year institu-
tion;
(b) Submits to a criminal history check as described in section 33-130,
Idaho Code;
(c) Completes a course consisting of a minimum of three (3) semester
credits in the statewide framework for teacher evaluations, which shall
include a laboratory component;
(d) Submits a letter of support from a charter holder; and
(e) Has one (1) or more of the following:
(i) Four (4) or more years of experience administering a public
charter school;
(ii) A postbaccalaureate degree and a minimum of five (5) years
of experience in school administration, public administration,
business administration, or military administration;


(iii) Successful completion of a nationally recognized charter
school leaders fellowship; or
(iv) Four (4) or more years of teaching experience and a commit-
ment from an administrator at a charter school in academic, op-
erational, and financial good standing, according to its autho-
rizer's most recent review, to mentor the applicant for a minimum
of one (1) year.
(5) A charter school administrator certificate is valid for five (5)
years and renewable thereafter. Administrators shall be subject to over-
sight by the professional standards commission. Certificates may be revoked
pursuant to the provisions of section 33-1208, Idaho Code. Issuance of a
certificate to any applicant may be refused for such reason as would have
constituted grounds for revocation.
(6) Certified teachers in a public charter school shall be considered
public school teachers. Educational experience shall accrue for service in
a public charter school and be counted by any school district for any teacher
who has been employed in a public charter school. The staff of the public
charter school shall be considered a separate unit for the purposes of col-
lective bargaining.
(7) Charter school teachers may be certified pursuant to the require-
ments set forth in chapter 12, title 33, Idaho Code, pertaining to tradi-
tional public school districts or may hold a charter school-specific teach-
ing certificate.
(a) Criteria for a charter school-specific teaching certificate shall
be in writing and require that teachers satisfy the provisions set forth
in section 33-1202 1., 3., and 4., Idaho Code, and meet the following
minimum educational or professional qualifications:
(i) Hold a bachelor's degree from an accredited institution; or
(ii) If instructing students in the fields of career technical
education, satisfy the provisions of section 33-2205(6)(a), Idaho
Code. Career technical education programs taught by teachers
with a charter school-specific teaching certificate shall receive
added-cost funding set forth in section 33-2215, Idaho Code, in an
amount equal to programs taught by teachers with an occupational
specialist teaching certificate.
(b) Teachers with a charter school-specific teaching certificate shall
receive mentoring and professional development as approved by the char-
ter holder.
(c) The state board of education shall issue charter school-specific
teaching certificates to teachers upon recommendation of the individ-
ual charter school, unless denied on the grounds set forth in section
33-1208, Idaho Code.
(d) For teachers holding a charter school-specific teaching certifi-
cate, a charter school may substitute its own ongoing education and pro-
fessional development requirements in place of those set forth in rule
by the state board of education if the same number of credit hours is
required as that of teachers holding a standard instructional certifi-
cate.
(8) Public charter schools may contract with educational services
providers subject to the following provisions:


(a) Educational services providers shall be third-party entities sepa-
rate from the public charter schools with which they contract and shall
not be considered governmental entities, provided that such contracts
may be evaluated by the authorizer;
(b) No more than one-third (1/3) of the public charter school's board
membership may be comprised of nonprofit educational services provider
representatives. Nonprofit educational services provider repre-
sentatives may not be employees of the public charter school or the
educational services provider and may not hold office as president or
treasurer on the public charter school's board. For-profit educational
services providers may not have representatives on the public charter
school's board of directors;
(c) Charter holders shall annually disclose any existing and potential
conflicts of interest, pecuniary or otherwise, with affiliated educa-
tional services providers;
(d) Charter holders shall retain accountability for academic, fiscal,
and organizational operations and outcomes of the school and may not re-
linquish this responsibility to any other entity;
(e) Contracts must ensure that school boards retain the right to termi-
nate the contract for failure to meet defined performance standards af-
ter notice and a reasonable cure period has expired and if material de-
ficiencies have not been cured prior to that time period expiring;
(f) Contracts must ensure that assets purchased by educational ser-
vices providers on behalf of the school, using public funds, shall
remain assets of the school. The provisions of this paragraph shall
not prevent educational services providers from acquiring assets using
revenue acquired through management fees;
(g) Charter holders shall consult legal counsel independent of the
party with whom they are contracting for purposes of reviewing the
school's management contract and facility lease or purchase agreements
to ensure compliance with applicable state and federal law, including
requirements that state entities not enter into contracts that obligate
them beyond the terms of any appropriation of funds by the state legis-
lature;
(h) Charter holders must ensure that their facility contracts are sepa-
rate from management contracts; and
(i) A virtual school shall be deemed financially sufficient if there is
an agreement that requires an educational services provider to assume
the virtual school's financial risk when it does not have sufficient
residual funds to pay the educational services provider. Where this
paragraph is applicable, the educational services provider shall make
its audited financial statements available, unless the educational
services provider already makes such audited financial statements pub-
licly available for compliance with other federal or state laws.
(9) Admission procedures, including provision for over-enrollment,
shall provide that the initial admission procedures for a public charter
school will be determined by lottery or other random method, except as oth-
erwise provided in this section. A charter holder shall strive to ensure
that citizens in the primary attendance area are made aware of the enrollment
opportunities and deadline. The public notice must include the enrollment


deadline, the public charter school's total enrollment capacity for the next
school year, and an advisory that all prospective students will be given
the opportunity to enroll in the public charter school regardless of race,
color, national origin, ethnicity, religion, gender, socioeconomic status,
or special needs.
(a) If initial capacity is insufficient to enroll all pupils who submit
a timely application, then the admission procedures may provide that
preference shall be given in the following order: first, to children
of founders, provided that this admission preference shall be limited
to not more than ten percent (10%) of the capacity of the public charter
school; second, to children of families with at least one (1) parent or
legal guardian who is on active duty or on active guard and reserve duty,
as those terms are defined in 10 U.S.C. 101; third, to siblings of pupils
already selected by the lottery or other random method; third fourth, to
pupils seeking to transfer from another Idaho public charter school or
authorizer at which they have been enrolled for at least one (1) year,
provided that this admission preference shall be subject to an exist-
ing written agreement for such preference between the subject charter
schools or authorizer; fourth fifth, to students residing within the
primary attendance area of the public charter school; and fifth sixth,
by an equitable selection process such as a lottery or other random
method. A public charter school may weight the school's lottery to
preference admission for the following educationally disadvantaged
students: students living at or below one hundred eighty-five percent
(185%) of the federal poverty level, students who are homeless or in
foster care, children with disabilities as defined in section 33-2001,
Idaho Code, students with limited English proficiency, and students who
are at-risk as defined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code. A public charter
school may include the children of full-time employees of the public
charter school within the first priority group, subject to the limita-
tions therein.
(b) If capacity is insufficient to enroll all pupils who submit a timely
application for subsequent school terms, then the admission procedures
may provide that preference shall be given in the following order:
first, to pupils returning to the public charter school in the second
or any subsequent year of its operation; and then as provided in para-
graph (a) of this subsection. The sibling preference in subsequent
school years applies to siblings of a returning pupil and of a pupil
selected by the lottery or other random method. A new lottery shall be
conducted each year to fill vacancies that become available. A public
charter school may weight the school's lottery to preference admission
as provided in this paragraph and paragraph (a) of this subsection and
for children who attended the public charter school within the previous
three (3) school years but withdrew as a result of the relocation of a
parent or guardian due to an academic sabbatical or an employer or mili-
tary transfer or reassignment.
(c) Each public charter school shall establish a process under which a
child may apply for enrollment or register for courses, regardless of
where such child resides at the time of application or registration, if
the child is a dependent of a member of the United States armed forces


who has received transfer orders to a location in Idaho and will, upon
such transfer, reside in an area served by the public charter school.
If capacity is insufficient as described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this
subsection, a child described in this paragraph shall be treated as a
student residing within the primary attendance area of the public char-
ter school for purposes of preference. Otherwise, such children shall
be included in the highest priority group for which they would otherwise
be eligible.
(d) Admission to a public charter school shall be determined by a selec-
tion process held within seven (7) days of the enrollment deadlines es-
tablished by the charter holder. The selection process must take place
in a public setting, the date and time of which must be noticed to the
public at least forty-eight (48) hours in advance.
(e) Within seven (7) days after conducting the selection process, the
charter holder shall send an offer to the legal guardian who submitted a
written request for admission on behalf of a student notifying such per-
son that the student has been selected for admission to the public char-
ter school. An offer must be signed by such student's parent or guardian
and returned to the public charter school by the date designated in such
offer letter. Remaining students shall be notified that they may be el-
igible for admission at a later date if a seat becomes available.
(f) If a school exceeds its projected student count in a lottery and
a sufficient wait list exists, the school may increase enrollment by
adding additional students per grade, not to exceed the total amount of
students authorized by the charter.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.